Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.023

Multistate licensing system—Director's discretion.

Applicants may be required to make application through a multistate licensing system as prescribed by the director. Existing licensees may be required to transition onto a multistate licensing system as prescribed by the director.

[ 2012 c 17 s 15.]